Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3003] Powers of the research
corporation. The research corporation, under the direction of the board of
directors, shall have the following general powers:

(1) To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws governing the
conduct of its business and the exercise of the powers and performance of
duties granted to or imposed upon it by law;

(2) To sell, lease, rent, hold, maintain, use, and
operate any property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, in
accordance with the conditions under which it was received;

(3) To enter into and perform such contracts, leases,
cooperative agreements, or other transactions with the university or any other
agency or political subdivision of the State, any private person, firm,
partnership, association, company, or corporation, only as it may be necessary
in the conduct of its business and on such terms as it may deem appropriate;
provided that the research corporation shall not obligate any funds of the
State except those that have been appropriated to it. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, the research corporation may enter into and perform such contracts,
leases, cooperative agreements, or other transactions with any agency or
instrumentality of the United States, a foreign nation, a state, a territory,
or a possession, or with any political subdivision thereof, whenever the
donating or granting agency or instrumentality determines that the university
or any other agency of the State cannot as effectively and efficiently
accomplish the purposes for which such contracts, leases, cooperative
agreements, or other transactions are being entered into; provided that the
research corporation shall not obligate any funds of the State except those
that have been appropriated to it;

(4) To receive by gifts, grants, devises, bequests,
or otherwise from private sources only, any property, real, personal, or mixed,
intangible or tangible, absolutely or in trust, to be used and disposed of,
either the principal or the income therefrom, in accordance with the conditions
under which it was received; except that no gift to the research corporation
shall be accepted unless approved or confirmed by the board of directors.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the research corporation may receive gifts,
grants, or awards from any agency or instrumentality of the United States, a
foreign nation, a state, a territory, or a possession, or from any political
subdivision thereof, whenever the donating or granting agency or
instrumentality determines that the university or any other agency of the State
cannot as effectively and efficiently accomplish the purposes for which the
gifts, grants, or awards are being made, except that no gift to the research
corporation shall be accepted unless approved or confirmed by the board of
directors;

(5) To have a corporate seal;

(6) To sue and be sued in its own name;

(7) To serve as trustee or beneficiary under terms of
any gift, indenture, or will;

(8) To apply for, take out, receive by purchase or
gift, hold, administer, and dispose of copyrights, patent rights, licenses,
assignments of inventions, discoveries, processes, and other property, rights
or interests therein, and the income thereof, absolutely or subject to such
conditions or trusts as may be attached thereto or be imposed thereon, and to
obligate itself to perform and execute any and all such conditions or trusts;

(9) To conduct research, studies, experiments,
investigations, and tests in all fields of knowledge; to promote and develop
the scientific and commercial value of inventions, discoveries, and processes;
and to make, publish, and distribute the results thereof;

(10) To coordinate and correlate activities and
projects of the research corporation with the work of state agencies for the
purpose of relating research work to the economic development of the State
whenever practical or desirable;

(11) To stimulate and promote cooperative research
projects and activities;

(12) To establish and maintain, or to assist in
establishing and maintaining, scholarships, fellowships, and professorships, and
other staff positions for the purpose of aiding in the acquisition and
dissemination of knowledge and to enter into agreements or contracts with other
corporations, organizations, institutions, or persons for this purpose and to
pay the necessary and appropriate expenses therefor;

(13) To prepare, print, or publish any manuscript,
research article, report, study, discussion, reference, collection, or any
pictorial or schematic representation or group or collection thereof, whether
it belongs to or is the work of any state agency or its employees, or the
university or one of its faculty members or employees, or the research
corporation or its employees, or a contractor of the research corporation. The
printing or publication may be accomplished through whatever person, company,
or agency is deemed most appropriate by the board of directors; and

(14) To do any or all other acts reasonably necessary
to carry out the objects and purposes of the research corporation and the
university. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next